Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3814
Certificate of authority; issuance; when.

The director shall issue a certificate of authority to a corporation organized under sections 44-3801 to 44-3826 if:

(1) The director finds that all requirements of law have been met;

(2) The director is satisfied that all natural persons who are incorporators, the directors and principal officers of corporate incorporators, and the proposed directors and officers of the corporation being formed are trustworthy, competent, and collectively have the competence and experience to offer the particular plans proposed; and

(3) The director is satisfied that the plan is consistent with the interest of the persons to be served and the public.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 14.